Hawaii statutes.
§414-214 Waiver of notice of meeting.
(a) A director may waive any notice required by this chapter, the articles of
incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the
notice. Except as provided by subsection (b), the waiver shall be in writing,
signed by the director entitled to the notice or by electronic transmission by
the director entitled to notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate
records.

(b) A director's attendance at or
participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the
meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon
the director's arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business
at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at
the meeting. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §23]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next